Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska88-543.01
Civil penalty.

The commission may assess a civil penalty, pursuant to section 75-156, against any person who violates the Grain Warehouse Act.

Laws 2003, LB 735, § 15.